src/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc
LEXICON Abbreviations
	ab ;
	# ;

LEXICON ab 
BBC+N+Prop+Abbr+Fem:bbc ab_fem ;
BBC+N+Prop+Abbr+Fem:BBC ab_fem ;

GMT+N+Abbr:GMT FINAL ;
SGA+N+Prop+Abbr:SGA FINAL ;
CSS+N+Prop+Abbr:CSS FINAL ; 
TV+N+Abbr:TV FINAL ;
UK+N+Prop+Abbr:UK FINAL ;
UK+N+Prop+Abbr:uk FINAL ;
CO+N+Prop+Abbr:CO FINAL ;
CO+N+Prop+Abbr:co FINAL ;


LEXICON ab_fem
+Def+Sg+Abs+Prox:da FINAL ;
+Indef+Sg+Abs:0 FINAL ;
+Indef+Sg+Nom:0 FINAL ;
+Indef+Sg+Gen:0 FINAL ;


! vim: set ts=4 sw=4 tw=0 syntax=lexc :
